Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2503.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION FOR WORKFORCE HOUSING DEVELOPMENT.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency for a grant to the Center for African Immigrants and Refugees Organization (CAIRO) for the construction of 70 units of workforce housing as part of the Iskufilan Village development in St. Cloud, Minnesota. The purpose of the project is to provide safe, modern, and affordable housing for low-income and middle-income families that are frontline workers. This is a onetime appropriation. Any amount encumbered under contract on or before June 30, 2025, is available until June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Authorized expenditures. new text end new text begin (a) Money appropriated under this section may be used only to construct residential housing in the Iskufilan Village. new text end new text begin (1) At least ten percent of the residential units must be reserved for affordable housing. For the purposes of this subdivision "affordable housing" means rental units targeted at households with incomes at or below 60 percent of the area median income, adjusted for household size, as determined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development. new text end new text begin (2) The remaining residential units must be designated for middle-income households. For the purposes of this subdivision a "middle-income household" means a household earning more than 60 percent of the area median income up to 120 percent of the area median income, adjusted for household size, as determined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development. new text end new text begin (b) CAIRO shall oversee project planning, construction, and housing allocation, ensuring compliance with all state and local workforce housing requirements. CAIRO must prioritize design plans that are energy-efficient, family-friendly, and provide two-, three-, and four-bedroom units suitable for workforce families. new text end new text begin (c) The Minnesota Housing Finance Agency shall oversee funding and ensure compliance with workforce housing affordability guidelines. CAIRO must report to the commissioner of the Housing Finance Agency on compliance with the housing requirements in paragraph (a) when the residential housing reaches a 90 percent occupancy level. new text end